Massachusetts, session 194th, S3034.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 35SSS the following section:-   
3  Section 35TTT. PFAS Remediation Trust Fund  
4  (a) As used in this section, the following words, unless the context clearly requires 
5 otherwise, shall have the following meanings:-    
6  “Ambient air”, that portion of the atmosphere, external to buildings, to which the general 
7 public has access.  
8  “Board of health”, any body politic or political subdivision of the commonwealth that 
9 acts as a board of health, public health commission or a health department for a municipality, 
10 region or district, including, but not limited to, municipal boards of health, regional health 
11 districts established pursuant to G.L. c. 111, § 27B and boards of health that share services 

2 of 36 12 pursuant to G.L. c. 40, § 4A or other legally constituted governmental unit within the 
13 Commonwealth having the usual powers and duties of the board of health of a city or town.   
14  “Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of environmental protection   
15  “Department”, the department of environmental protection  
16  “Fund”, the PFAS Remediation Trust Fund established in this section.   
17  “Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS”, as defined and regulated by the 
18 department or identified, on the basis of a health assessment conducted pursuant to the 
19 department’s drinking water regulations, as posing an unacceptable health risk to consumers.   
20  “Regional system”, any system established by mutual agreement of two or more 
21 municipalities or a county in which all municipalities of said county have an agreement where 
22 such system provides drinking water or wastewater services, or both, through shared facilities, 
23 sources or distribution networks.    
24  (b) (1) There shall be a PFAS Remediation Trust Fund. Expenditures from the fund shall 
25 be made by the department, without further appropriation and consistent with this section, the 
26 terms of settlements, judgments, and awards made in connection with claims arising from the 
27 manufacture, marketing or sale of PFAS and PFAS-containing products, and consistent with the 
28 terms of other allocations and monies transferred to this fund, as applicable. The commissioner 
29 shall administer the fund, shall prioritize expenditures to communities with vulnerable 
30 environmental justice populations, and may make expenditures from the fund to develop and 
31 implement a multilingual outreach and education program pursuant to section 29 of chapter 21A 
32 of the General Laws.  

3 of 36 33  (2) The fund shall be expended to mitigate the impacts of PFAS contamination in the 
34 commonwealth, including PFAS contamination in drinking water, groundwater, soil, sediment, 
35 surface water, wastewater, sludge or sludge products, sewage, landfills and other media as 
36 appropriate. Such mitigation may include, but is not limited to, projects to assist counties, 
37 municipalities or other public entities with a direct impact on public water supplies, private well 
38 owners, and public water systems with the cost of PFAS treatment and remediation, including 
39 but not limited to remediation projects, treatment and mitigation. The commissioner shall make 
40 necessary expenditures from this account for the shared administrative costs of the operations 
41 and programs of the department related to the fund. The commissioner shall further direct that 
42 monies from the fund shall be expended to provide services in an amount reasonably related to 
43 such administrative costs. No expenditure shall be made from the fund that would cause the fund 
44 to be in deficit at the close of a fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to 
45 further appropriation and monies remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not 
46 revert to the General Fund but shall instead be available for expenditure during subsequent fiscal 
47 years. Any fiscal year-end balance in the fund shall be excluded from the calculation of the 
48 consolidated net surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29.   
49  (3) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) amounts recovered by the commonwealth and 
50 credited thereto in connection with claims arising from the manufacture and associated 
51 processes, distribution, marketing or sale of PFAS and other PFAS-containing products; (ii) 
52 transfers from other funds authorized by the general court and so designated; (iii) funds from 
53 public or private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations, rebates, 
54 settlements, judgments, awards and other allocations received by the commonwealth designated 
55 to the fund; and (iv) any interest earned on such amounts.   

4 of 36 56  (c) The commissioner may award and administer grants from the fund, without further 
57 appropriation, consistent with the purposes of the fund described in this section. Further, subject 
58 to this section, grants may be made, without limitation, to: (i) municipalities and counties for 
59 municipal and county use, including, but not limited to, establishing connections to regional 
60 systems and funds necessary to address the reasonable administrative costs of the municipality; 
61 (ii) boards of health for use in assisting private well users; (iii) community water systems for use 
62 on an existing system or to expand a system to assist additional water users; (iv) non-transient 
63 non-community water systems; and (v) transient non-community water systems.   
64  (d) The department shall adopt regulations, rules, or policies for the use of monies in the 
65 fund and shall include conditions in grant documents to require that that applicants disclose any 
66 funds recovered from liable third parties or other sources to cover any costs eligible to be 
67 reimbursed by said grant programs and to deduct said recovered funds from the total costs in the 
68 grant application. The department shall also require any person awarded a grant for cost 
69 reimbursement to report the recovery of any such costs in the future and to reimburse the fund by 
70 reimbursing such recovered costs to the department. The department shall further adopt 
71 regulations, rules, or policies establishing criteria to ensure that an applicant shall not be eligible 
72 for grants for any project or portion of a project to the extent the negligence of the applicant 
73 caused the contamination that resulted in the exceedance of applicable state or federal standards 
74 for PFAS in drinking water, groundwater, soil, and other environmental media.   
75  (e) If the department provides a grant related to costs for a project for which a third party 
76 might otherwise be liable, the right to recover payment from such third party, excluding public 
77 sector fire departments for the use of Class B firefighting foam in emergency responses, shall be 
78 subrogated to the department to the extent of such grant. Any money recovered by the 

5 of 36 79 department from such third parties shall be deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding any other 
80 general or special law to the contrary, the superior court shall have jurisdiction for subrogation 
81 claims brought pursuant to this chapter, and civil actions brought by the attorney general for 
82 subrogated claims to recover costs pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced within five years 
83 from the date the commonwealth is assigned the rights to recover all such costs or five years 
84 from the date the commonwealth discovers that the person against whom the action is being 
85 brought is a person liable pursuant to law, whichever is later.  
86  (f)(1) The department may consult with the department of public health to provide 
87 funding from the fund for boards of health to establish rebate and grant programs for the 
88 reimbursement of private well users and owners for the costs of private well water sampling, 
89 installation, and operation and maintenance of PFAS treatment systems. Eligible spending for 
90 rebate shall include, but is not limited to, sampling of private well water for those PFAS that are 
91 regulated for public water systems by the department’s drinking water regulations and 
92 installation of permanent treatment systems to remove PFAS from drinking water.  Eligible 
93 spending for grants shall include, but is not limited to, payment to vendors for PFAS water 
94 testing and installation and maintenance of PFAS treatment systems, provided that such private 
95 well users and owners can establish that their income was below the state median household 
96 income rate or below 120% area median income, whichever is lower, in the year in which the 
97 costs were incurred and that such costs were incurred after the effective date of this section.  
98  (2) Boards of health may elect to receive funding from the fund pursuant to any program 
99 established pursuant to paragraph (1) and may apply for and receive grants from the fund 
100 necessary to cover reasonable administrative costs related to implementation of said paragraph 
101 (1). Boards of health that elect to participate shall amend their codes to require private well water 

6 of 36 102 quality testing for PFAS for property sales and new construction consistent with model bylaws 
103 and ordinances provided by the department through program guidance.   
104  (3) Annually, not later than August 31, boards of health that elect to participate pursuant 
105 to paragraph (2) shall submit a report to the department including information demonstrating 
106 compliance during the preceding fiscal year with said paragraph (2) and other such information 
107 as required by the department.  
108  (g) Annually, not later than October 1, the department shall file a report on the activity, 
109 revenue and expenditures to and from the fund in the prior fiscal year with the clerks of the 
110 house of representatives and the senate and the house and senate committees on ways and means, 
111 and shall make the report available on the department’s website. The report shall include, but not 
112 be limited to: (i) revenue credited to the fund; (ii) the amount of expenditure attributable to the 
113 administrative costs of the department; (iii) an itemized list of expenditures from the fund; (iv) 
114 rebate and grant expenditures to private well users and owners and municipal administrative 
115 expenses of boards of health opting into such rebate and grant programs; and (v) data and a 
116 report of how resources have been directed to environmental justice populations.  
117  SECTION 2. Chapter 16 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
118 2 sections:- 
119  Section 25.  Sludge management; master plan 
120  (a) The department shall investigate and study the sludge disposal needs of the 
121 commonwealth. In doing so, the department may incorporate the scientific research and technical 
122 findings included in, but not limited to, the following reports:  

7 of 36 123  (1) “MassDEP PFAS Testing Study for NPDES POTWs (PRF77),” published on June 
124 30, 2025, which documented PFAS contamination in influent, effluent and sewage sludge 
125 generated at every publicly owned treatment works in the commonwealth, with sludge 
126 consistently containing the highest concentrations of PFAS measured anywhere in the 
127 wastewater treatment system; and 
128  (2) “Current and Near-Term Management of Massachusetts Wastewater Sludge,” 
129 published on June 28, 2024, which assessed sludge generation, existing treatment and hauling 
130 capacity, available disposal outlets, regional infrastructure constraints and current technological 
131 limitations that prevent wastewater treatment facilities from removing PFAS or reducing sludge 
132 toxicity under current systems.  
133  (b) Having already established through said reports that PFAS contamination of sewage 
134 sludge is universal, persistent and technologically unavoidable with existing wastewater 
135 treatment processes, the department’s investigation under this section shall focus on the 
136 outstanding economic and operational questions related to sewage sludge management not 
137 addressed in prior studies. For the purposes of this section, toxicity shall include any and all 
138 pathogens, chemicals or other agents or molecules regulated by the commonwealth, and any 
139 substance known to cause harm to human health. Said study shall identify, to the maximum 
140 practicable extent: 
141  (1) For each wastewater treatment plan in the commonwealth:  
142  (i) The current arrangements for the collection, transfer, processing, treatment and 
143 disposal of sewage sludge;  

8 of 36 144  (ii) The current costs for the collection, transfer, processing, treatment and disposal of 
145 sewage sludge, including, but not limited to:  
146  (iii) The costs to the wastewater treatment plant to haul and dispose of sewage sludge 
147 from the wastewater treatment plant;   
148  (iv) The total payments to outside vendors to haul, dispose of or process sewage sludge 
149 generated at the wastewater treatment plant; and  
150  (v) The final location of sewage sludge, including, but not limited to, whether the sewage 
151 sludge is transported to: 
152  (A) an in-state landfill;  
153  (B) an out-of-state landfill;  
154  (C) a monofill landfill;  
155  (D) an incinerator;  
156  (E) a composting or co-composting facility; or  
157  (F) any other processing site; and 
158  (G) Appropriate technologies and practices for reducing the volume and toxicity of 
159 sewage sludge and improving wastewater treatment design and operation, delineated by cost, 
160 target wastewater treatment plant size and capacity and geographic location.  
161  (c) The department, after not less than 3 public hearings, held in geographically diverse 
162 areas of the commonwealth, and a public comment period, shall develop and maintain a 

9 of 36 163 comprehensive statewide master plan for sludge processing and disposal, including any 
164 necessary provisions to meet eligibility requirements under any federal program for financial aid 
165 in sludge management. Said plan shall describe, to the maximum practicable extent, a short and 
166 long-range program for reduction and management of sludge throughout the commonwealth, and 
167 the funding for the development of such systems, infrastructure and facilities which the 
168 department finds to be reasonably necessary. 
169  The plan shall be updated at a frequency to be determined by the commissioner, but not 
170 less frequently than every 10 years. Any amendment, alterations or changes to said master plan 
171 shall be adopted only after a public hearing.  
172  Without limitation of the foregoing, said plan shall include, but not be limited to: 
173  (1) A program for providing technical assistance and funding to entities that own a 
174 publicly-owned treatment works, hereafter referred to as POTWs, as defined in section 12B of 
175 chapter 132 A, to develop local sludge management plans; 
176  (2) A template local sludge management plan which entities that own and operate a 
177 POTW shall adopt and may alter; provided that any alterations are certified by the department as 
178 being compliance with the goals of this section; and provided further that no such entity shall be 
179 required to adopt a plan without having received technical assistance or funding from the 
180 department; 
181  (3) Goals and measurable benchmarks for the reduction, processing, toxicity and disposal 
182 of sludge in the commonwealth, as well as detailed methods and solutions to achieve said goals 
183 and benchmarks, including, but not limited to: 

10 of 36 184  (i) the creation and maintenance of specialized landfills for sludge disposal; 
185  (ii) the implementation of methods for reducing the volume and toxicity of sludge, 
186 including by, but not limited to, facilitating source reduction, remediation and gasification;  
187  (iii) the development of new or improved technologies and methods for reducing the 
188 volume and toxicity of sludge;  
189  (iv) the remediation of toxic chemicals and substances in wastewater and in sludge; and  
190  (v) viable research investments the commonwealth could make to further the goals laid 
191 out in said plan;  
192  (4) Criteria that would trigger updates to the plan, including, but not limited to, 
193 advancements in the treatment of sludge and procedures for determining if and how sludge could 
194 possibly be safely applied to land in the commonwealth; and 
195  (5) Estimates of the expected financial resources, and any regulatory or statutory changes, 
196 needed to implement said plan. 
197  The plan shall prioritize providing technical assistance and funding to entities that own a 
198 POTW; provided that the plan and any included funding formula or grant application criteria 
199 shall also prioritize geographic equity and environmental justice principles, as defined in section 
200 62 of chapter 30.  
201  The statewide master plan for sludge processing and disposal shall be posted online on 
202 the department’s website. All data, comments and reporting used by the department in drafting 
203 the plan shall be made easily available to the public on the department’s website. 

11 of 36 204  Section 25A. Sludge management grant program 
205  The department of environmental protection shall establish a grant program to aid owners 
206 of wastewater treatment facilities in researching practices and technologies; implementing 
207 practices, technologies and programs; and overhauling systems and infrastructure to reduce the 
208 volume of sludge and reduce the toxicity of the wastewater entering the treatment plant. The 
209 department shall prioritize providing grant funding to entities that own a publicly-owned 
210 treatment works, as defined in section 12B of chapter 132 A.  
211  SECTION 3. Chapter 20 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
212 section 32 the following section:- 
213  Section 33. Sludge management  
214  An individual or entity engaged in the practice of farming, as defined in section 1A of 
215 chapter 128, shall be immune from suit and civil liability for any damages resulting from claims 
216 based on harms caused by PFAS present in soil, water, livestock or agricultural products as a 
217 result of standard agricultural practices or source contamination outside of their control; provided 
218 that the following individuals or entities shall not be immune: (i) those engaged in the production 
219 or distribution of PFAS-containing materials, including but not limited to biosolids, as defined in 
220 section 171A of chapter 111; (ii) those engaged in the production, distribution or disposal of 
221 industrial waste; (iii) those engaged in the operation of incinerators; and (v) those who 
222 knowingly engage in the land application of biosolids after June 30, 2028. For the purposes of 
223 this section, “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one 
224 fully fluorinated carbon atom.   

12 of 36 225  SECTION 4. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
226 section 43A the following section:-   
227  Section 43B. (a) The department of environmental protection shall amend each 
228 groundwater discharge permit upon renewal with requirements for monitoring and reporting of 
229 per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances using United States Environmental Protection Agency 
230 analytical methods as specified by the department.   
231  (b) The department of environmental protection shall amend its surface water discharge 
232 permits issued to industrial permittees and groundwater discharge permits issued to industrial 
233 permittees upon renewal with requirements to implement best management practices for 
234 discharges of PFAS, including, but not limited to: (i) product elimination or substitution when a 
235 reasonable alternative to using PFAS is available in the industrial process; (ii) accidental 
236 discharge minimization; and (iii) equipment decontamination or replacement where PFAS 
237 products have historically been used. These industrial permittees shall include those that use or 
238 previously used PFAS or PFAS products or those where best management practices are 
239 warranted based on the department’s review of discharge monitoring.   
240  (c) The department of environmental protection shall include effluent limitations and 
241 treatment requirements for PFAS in groundwater discharge permits upon renewal.    
242  SECTION 5. Section 8 of Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
243 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “one hundred and sixty-six, 
244 inclusive” the following words:- , one hundred and seventy-one A.  
245  SECTION 6. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after31 
246 section 28 the following section:-   

13 of 36 247  Section 29. PFAS awareness campaign 
248  (a) The department, in consultation with the department of public health, shall develop 
249 and implement a multilingual public awareness campaign to promote the education of 
250 Massachusetts residents, including environmental justice populations, of  per- and 
251 polyfluoroalkyl substances contamination across the commonwealth and potential health impacts 
252 of PFAS exposure. The campaign shall include the development and distribution of educational 
253 materials, drafted in plain language to the extent possible, the content of which shall include, but 
254 not be limited to: (i) the potential health impacts  of PFAS exposure; (ii) the routes of PFAS 
255 exposure, including but not limited to, drinking water, groundwater, surface water, wastewater, 
256 land application of biosolids, landfills, air, and fish tissue; (iii) consumer products that are known 
257 to contain PFAS; (iv) PFAS in Class B firefighting foam; (v) a list of facilities that are known 
258 and potential sources of PFAS and are required to prepare a toxics use reduction plan for PFAS 
259 within 10 miles of the environmental justice populations; (vi) assistance programs for PFAS 
260 remediation; and (vii) citizen involvement pursuant to G.L. c. 21I, § 18.  
261  (b) The educational materials shall be translated into the native languages spoken by the 
262 impacted environmental justice populations based on the federal census definition of English 
263 isolation. Such educational materials shall be made available to: (i) community centers; (ii) 
264 health care centers; (iii) schools, (iv) places of worship; (v) the department of education; (vi) the 
265 department of early education and care; (vii) and any other locations as determined by the 
266 department.  
267  (c) The department may contract or associate with public and private agencies and 
268 organizations for the preparation of said educational materials on PFAS exposure, other pertinent 

14 of 36 269 resource information on the matter of PFAS contamination and conducting educational 
270 programs. The department may use funds from the Fund, as established in section 35TTT of 
271 chapter 10 of the general laws, for such contracts.   
272  SECTION 7. Chapter 22D of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
273 section 6 the following section:-  
274  Section 7. Firefighting foam  
275  (a) The following terms shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the 
276 following meanings:  
277  “Department”, department of fire services  
278  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
279 manufacturing or processing of that product; and the addition of PFAS is known or reasonably 
280 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
281 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
282 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions.  
283  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
284 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
285 control, or know.  
286  "Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
287 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.   

15 of 36 288  (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no person, local 
289 government or state agency shall use a Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally 
290 added PFAS in any amount for training, testing or emergency response purposes.    
291  (c) Any person, unit of local government, fire department, or state agency that discharges 
292 or releases Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS must notify the 
293 department of environmental protection’s emergency response line as soon as possible but no 
294 later than within  24 hours of the discharge or release.    
295  (d) The department shall assist the department of public health’s Occupational Health 
296 Surveillance Program in collecting data on occupational exposure to PFAS, including, but not 
297 limited to, firefighters.     
298  SECTION 8. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
299 section 2DDDDDD the following 2 sections:- 
300  Section 2EEEEEE. Agricultural PFAS Relief Fund 
301  (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate 
302 fund to be known as the Agricultural PFAS Relief Fund, which shall be used exclusively to assist 
303 farmers in the commonwealth who have suffered losses, incurred costs or reasonably anticipate 
304 suffering losses or incurring costs resulting from the actual or suspected presence of PFAS in 
305 soil, water, livestock or agricultural products; provided, that eligibility for this fund shall not 
306 extend to: (i) individuals or entities engaged in the production or distribution of PFAS-containing 
307 materials, including but not limited to biosolids, as defined in section 171A of chapter 111; (ii) 
308 individuals or entities engaged in the production, distribution or disposal of industrial waste; (iii) 
309 individuals or entities engaged in the operation of incinerators; and (iv) individuals or entities 

16 of 36 310 who knowingly engage in the land application of biosolids after June 30, 2028. For the purposes 
311 of this section, “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least 
312 one fully fluorinated carbon atom.  
313  (b) The Agricultural PFAS Relief Fund shall be credited with money from: (i) amounts 
314 recovered by the commonwealth and credited thereto in connection with claims arising from the 
315 sources of PFAS contamination found in biosolids products applied on agricultural land; (ii) any 
316 appropriations authorized by the general court specifically designated to be credited to the fund; 
317 (iii) gifts, grants and donations from public or private sources; (iv) federal reimbursements and 
318 grants-in-aid; and (v) any interest earned from the fund.  
319  (c) The commissioner of agricultural resources shall promulgate rules and regulations to 
320 direct the expenditure of money from this fund for purposes including, but not limited to: (i) 
321 testing of soil, water, livestock or agricultural products for PFAS; (ii) costs incurred from 
322 adapting management and business practices as a result of the disallowance of use of products 
323 containing PFAS or the disruption of business caused by the presence or suspected presence of 
324 PFAS; (iii) development and implementation of educational resources for farmers to adapt to 
325 management changes resulting from the presence of PFAS; (iv) physical and mental health needs 
326 of farm owners, farm workers and personnel resulting from exposure to PFAS; (v) remediation 
327 practices and needed infrastructure for the elimination of or protection from PFAS; and (vi) 
328 development of PFAS testing capacity at the Center for Agriculture, Food and the Environment 
329 at the University of Massachusetts at Amherst or other public institutions of higher education in 
330 the commonwealth. Regulations shall comply with the department of agricultural resources’ 
331 environmental justice policy.  

17 of 36 332  (d) The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund and shall receive, deposit and 
333 invest all funds under this section to ensure the highest interest rate available consistent with the 
334 safety of the fund. The books and records of the fund shall be subject to an annual audit by the 
335 state auditor. The department of agricultural resources may expend money in the fund without 
336 further appropriation and no expenditure from the fund shall cause it to be in deficiency at the 
337 close of a fiscal year.  
338  (e) The commissioner of agricultural resources shall report annually to the house and 
339 senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on agriculture and fisheries on 
340 income received into the fund and sources of that income, any expenditure from the fund and the 
341 purpose of that expenditure and the fund’s balance. Money in the fund at the end of the fiscal 
342 year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent 
343 year and shall not be subject to section 5C of chapter 29. 
344  Section 2FFFFFF. Agricultural Fertilizer Purchasing Fund 
345  There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund 
346 to be known as the Agricultural Fertilizer Purchasing Fund, which shall be used to assist 
347 commercial farmers in the commonwealth who can demonstrate that they are incurring 
348 additional costs in purchasing fertilizer as a result of the disallowance of use of products 
349 containing PFAS. The fund shall be administered by the secretary of energy and environmental 
350 affairs, in consultation with the commissioner of the department of agricultural resources. 
351  The fund shall be credited with appropriations or other money authorized or transferred 
352 by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund. Amounts credited to 
353 the fund shall be expended to farmers to support the purchase of fertilizer for commercial 

18 of 36 354 agricultural purposes in fiscal year 2027 and thereafter. Applications shall be noncompetitive and 
355 shall be accepted or denied based only upon whether farmers have met the eligibility 
356 requirements. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the 
357 General Fund. The fund shall not be subject to section 5C of chapter 29. 
358  SECTION 9. Section 12 of chapter 61A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
359 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following 
360 paragraph:-  
361  No conveyance tax under this section shall be assessed on land that is removed from 
362 agricultural or horticultural use due to regulatory action regarding the actual or suspected 
363 presence of PFAS in soil, water, or agricultural products derived from such land. For the 
364 purposes of this paragraph, “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic compounds 
365 containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom as defined under section 5U of chapter 111. 
366 The commissioner of agricultural resources, in consultation with the commissioner of revenue 
367 and the commissioner of environmental protection, may promulgate regulations to enforce this 
368 paragraph.   
369  SECTION 10. Section 13 of chapter 61A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
370 amended by adding the following subsection:-  
371  (e) No roll-back tax imposed by this section shall be assessed on land that no longer 
372 meets the definition of land actively devoted to agricultural, horticultural or agricultural and 
373 horticultural use due to regulatory action regarding the actual or suspected presence of PFAS in 
374 soil, water, or agricultural products derived from such land. For the purposes of this subsection, 
375 “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic compounds containing at least one fully 

19 of 36 376 fluorinated carbon atom as defined under section 5U of chapter 111. The commissioner of 
377 agricultural resources, in consultation with the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner 
378 of environmental protection, may promulgate regulations to enforce this subsection.   
379  SECTION 11. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
380 section 5S the following sections:-   
381  Section 5T. Food packaging 
382  (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires 
383 otherwise, have the following meanings:-   
384  “Agricultural products”, any vegetable, fruit, dairy, meat, fish, and poultry, and 
385 agricultural inputs, such as, but not limited to, feed, water, fertilizer, pesticides, produced and 
386 sold commercially in Massachusetts.  
387  “Department”, the department of public health. 
388  “Food package", a package or packaging component that is intended for the marketing, 
389 protection or handling of a product intended for direct food contact or used to store food and 
390 foodstuffs for sale.   
391  “Fully fluorinated carbon atom”, a carbon atom on which all the hydrogen substituents 
392 have been replaced by fluorine. 
393  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
394 manufacturing or processing of that product; the addition of which is known or reasonably 
395 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-

20 of 36 396 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
397 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions.  
398  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
399 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
400 control, or know.   
401  "Manufacturer", a person, firm, association, partnership, government entity, organization, 
402 joint venture or corporation that applies a package to a product for distribution or sale. In the 
403 case of a multi-component product, the manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce or 
404 assemble the product. If the multi-component product is produced in a foreign country, the 
405 manufacturer shall be the importer or domestic distributor.  
406  "Package", a container providing a means of marketing, protecting or handling a product 
407 which shall include a unit package, an intermediate package, a package used for shipping or 
408 transport and unsealed receptacles such as carrying cases, crates, cups, pails, rigid foil and other 
409 trays, wrappers and wrapping films, bags and tubs.   
410  "Packaging component", an individual assembled part of a package including, but not 
411 limited to, any interior or exterior blocking, bracing, cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior 
412 strapping, coatings, closures, inks and labels.   
413  "Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
414 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.    

21 of 36 415  (b) No manufacturer. Distributor, wholesaler or retailer shall sell, offer for sale, distribute 
416 for sale, or distribute for use in the commonwealth food packaging to which PFAS have been 
417 intentionally added in any amount.   
418  Section 5U. Consumer products 
419  (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires 
420 otherwise, have the following meanings:-    
421  “Child passenger restraint”, a child passenger restraint under G.L. c. 90, § 7AA.   
422  “Children’s product”, consumer products intended, made or marketed for use by children 
423 12 years of age or under, including: (i) toys; (ii) children’s clothing; (iii) children's cosmetics and 
424 personal care products; (iv) children's jewelry and novelty products; (v) children’s school 
425 supplies; (vi) children’s arts and crafts supplies, including model making supplies (vii) children’s 
426 bedding, furniture, and furnishings; (viii) child car seats; (ix) products to help a child with 
427 sucking or teething, or to facilitate sleep, relaxation, or the feeding of a child; (x) products that 
428 meet any of the following conditions, as determined by the department: represented in its 
429 packaging, display, or advertising as appropriate for use by children, sold in conjunction with, 
430 attached to, or packaged together with other products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised 
431 as appropriate for use by children sold in a retail store, catalogue, or online website, in which a 
432 person exclusively offers for sale products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as 
433 appropriate for use by children, or sold in a discrete portion of a retail store, catalogue, or online 
434 website, in which a person offers for sale products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as 
435 appropriate for use by children; provided, however, that “children’s product” shall not include: 
436 (i) batteries; (ii) slings and catapults; (iii) sets of darts with metallic points; (iv) toy steam 

22 of 36 437 engines; (v) bicycles and tricycles; (vi) video toys that can be connected to video screen and are 
438 operated at a nominal voltage exceeding twenty-four volts; (vii) chemistry sets; (viii) consumer 
439 and children's electronic products, including but not limited to personal computers, audio and 
440 video equipment, calculators, wireless phones, game consoles, and handheld devices 
441 incorporating a video screen, used to access interactive software and their associated peripherals; 
442 (ix) interactive software, intended for leisure and entertainment, including computer games and 
443 their storage media, including compact disks; (x) BB guns, pellet guns and air rifles; (xi) snow 
444 sporting equipment, including skis, poles, boots, snow boards, sleds and bindings; (xii) roller 
445 skates; (xiii) scooters; (xiv) model rockets; (xv) athletic shoes with cleats or spikes; (xvi) 
446 pocketknives and multitools; (xvii) pharmaceutical products and biologics; and (xviii) medical 
447 devices, as defined in the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, U,S,C, 21 section 321(h). 
448  “Consumer product,” any article that, to any significant extent, is distributed in 
449 commerce for personal use or consumption by individuals. 
450  “Cookware”, durable houseware items that are used in homes and restaurants to prepare, 
451 heat or dispense foodstuffs or beverages, including, but not limited to, pots, pans, skillets, grills, 
452 baking sheets, baking molds, trays, bowls and cooking utensils.   
453  “Current unavoidable use”, a use of PFAS that the department has determined under this 
454 section to be: (i) essential for health, safety or the functioning of society; (ii) necessary for the 
455 proper operation and functionality of a product; and; (iii) for which safer alternatives are not 
456 reasonably available.    
457  “Department”, the department of public health.   

23 of 36 458  “Distributor”, any person, firm or corporation who takes title to goods, produced either 
459 domestically or in a foreign country, purchased for resale or promotional purposes.   
460  “Fabric treatment”, a substance applied to fabric, carpets, rugs, shoes or textiles to impart 
461 characteristics, including, but not limited to, stain resistance or water resistance.    
462  “Fully fluorinated carbon atom”, a carbon atom on which all the hydrogen substituents 
463 have been replaced by fluorine.  
464  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
465 manufacturing or processing of that product; the addition of which is known or reasonably 
466 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
467 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
468 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions.  
469  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
470 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
471 control, or know.  
472  “Manufacturer”, any person, firm or corporation that manufactures a product whose 
473 brand name is affixed to the product. In the case of a product imported into the United States, 
474 “manufacturer” includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the product if the person 
475 that manufactured or assembled or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not have a 
476 presence in the United States.   
477  “Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
478 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.   

24 of 36 479  “Personal care products”, articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, 
480 introduced into or otherwise applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting 
481 attractiveness or altering the appearance. Personal care products shall include products such as 
482 skin moisturizers, perfumes, lipsticks, fingernail polishes, eye and facial makeup preparations, 
483 shampoos, permanent waves, hair colors, toothpastes, sunscreen, hair spray, shaving cream and 
484 deodorants, as well as any material intended for use as a component of a cosmetic product. 
485 Personal care products shall also include, but not be limited to, menstrual products such as 
486 sanitary napkins, menstrual underwear, tampons and underwear liners.   
487  “Priority product,” any child passenger restraint, children’s product, cookware, fabric 
488 treatment, personal care products, rugs and carpets, textile, textile furnishings, or upholstered 
489 furniture.  
490  “Product component”, a component of a consumer product, including the product’s 
491 ingredients or a part of the product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the consumer 
492 product is the manufacturer of the component.    
493  “Product label”, a display of written, printed or graphic material that appears on, or is 
494 affixed to, the exterior of a product, or its exterior container or wrapper that is visible to a 
495 consumer, if the product has an exterior container or wrapper.   
496  “Retailer”, any person, firm or corporation to whom a consumer product is delivered or 
497 sold, if such delivery or sale is for purposes of sale or distribution in commerce to purchasers 
498 who buy such product for purposes other than resale.   
499  “Rugs and carpets”, fabric used to or marketed to cover floors.   

25 of 36 500  “Textile”, any item made in whole or part from a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn, or 
501 fabric. Textile includes but is not limited to leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, viscose, nylon, 
502 and polyester.  
503  “Textile furnishings”, textile goods of a type customarily used in households and 
504 businesses, including but not limited to draperies, floor coverings, furnishings, bedding, towels, 
505 and tablecloths.  
506  “Upholstered furniture'', as defined in G.L. c. 94, § 270.   
507  “Wholesaler,” any person, firm or corporation to whom a consumer product is delivered 
508 or sold, if such delivery or sale is for purposes of sale or distribution in commerce to purchasers 
509 who buy such product for purposes of resale.   
510  (b) No manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer shall offer for sale, sell or 
511 distribute in the commonwealth any priority products to which PFAS have been intentionally 
512 added on or after January 1, 2029. The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to the sale 
513 or resale of used products.   
514  (c) The department of public health shall identify additional consumer products and other 
515 products for restriction. Such identified products shall be subject to the same prohibitions under 
516 this section.  
517  (1) No manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer shall offer for sale, sell or 
518 distribute in the commonwealth any consumer product that the department has identified for 
519 restriction, including but not limited to priority products, to which PFAS have been intentionally 
520 added, unless the department, in consultation with the department of environmental protection 

26 of 36 521 and the Toxics Use Reduction Institute, has determined that the use of PFAS in the consumer 
522 product is a currently unavoidable use and grants a temporary exemption at intervals of no more 
523 than 4 years.   
524  (2)  The department may assess a fee to cover the department’s reasonable costs and to 
525 support the purposes outlined in this section payable by a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler 
526 or retailer upon submission of an unavoidable use exemption request under section (c) paragraph 
527 (5). Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS Public Health Trust 
528 Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for the purposes outlined 
529 in this section.   
530  (3)  In the event that the department makes such a determination and grants an 
531 unavoidable use exemption, the department may require the manufacturer, distributor, 
532 wholesaler or retailer to label the product or products in a form and manner determined by the 
533 department.     
534  (4) The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to the sale or resale of used 
535 consumer products that the department has identified for restriction, including but not limited to 
536 priority products.   
537  (5) Consumer products or product categories in which the use of PFAS is a currently 
538 unavoidable use, as determined by the department, may be exempted for a fee to cover the 
539 department’s reasonable costs and to support the purposes outlined in this section, pursuant to a 
540 process established by the department..   
541  (6)  Annually, not later than December 31, the department shall file a report on the 
542 manufacturers, distributors, wholesalers or retailers submitting unavoidable use exemption 

27 of 36 543 requests with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on 
544 public health, and shall make the report available on the department’s website. The report shall 
545 include, but not be limited to: (i) the full name of the manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or 
546 retailer applying for an unavoidable use exemption; (ii) if the department granted the 
547 manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer an exemption or not; (iii) the department's 
548 reasoning for granting the exemption; and (iv) the length of the exemption.    
549  (d)(1) The department shall, in consultation with the department of environmental 
550 protection and the Toxics Use Reduction Institute, prepare a study of significant PFAS uses in 
551 consumer products not subject to this section using publicly available information, within 4 years 
552 of the passage of this law, and shall update the study within 7 years of the passage of this law. 
553 The study shall consider whether: (i) safer alternatives to PFAS are reasonably available; (ii) the 
554 function provided by PFAS in the product is necessary for the product to perform its primary 
555 function as determined by the department; and (iii) the use of PFAS in the product is essential for 
556 health or safety. The report shall recommend additional products and product categories to be 
557 considered for restriction under this section.  
558  (2) The department may establish additional consumer products and product components 
559 to be considered priority products covered by this section. In identifying additional product 
560 categories for analysis, the department shall consult with Toxics Use Reduction Institute and the 
561 department of environmental protection.  
562  (e) The attorney general shall have the exclusive authority to enforce the provisions of 
563 this section pursuant to G.L. c. 93A, § 4.   

28 of 36 564  (f) (1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of 
565 public health shall establish, on or before June 1, 2028, a publicly accessible reporting platform 
566 to collect information about per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, or “PFAS”, and consumer 
567 products or product components containing PFAS being sold, offered for sale, distributed or 
568 offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the state. The department may consult 
569 with Interstate Chemicals Clearinghouse and other environmental or public health experts, and 
570 may collaborate with other states with prohibitions on PFAS to establish such a platform.    
571  (2) On or before June 1, 2028, and on or before June 1 of each year thereafter, a 
572 manufacturer of PFAS of a priority product, additional consumer products identified for 
573 restriction by the department or product component containing intentionally added PFAS that is 
574 sold, offered for sale, distributed or offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the 
575 state shall register the PFAS or the consumer product or product component containing 
576 intentionally added PFAS on the publicly accessible reporting platform created pursuant to 
577 paragraph (1), along with all of the following information, as applicable: (i) the name and type of 
578 consumer product or product component containing intentionally added PFAS; (ii) the universal 
579 product code, or “UPC,” of the consumer product or product component containing intentionally 
580 added PFAS; (iii) the name and address of the manufacturer, and the name, address and phone 
581 number of the contact person for the manufacturer; and (iv) any additional information 
582 established by the department as necessary to implement the requirements of this section.    
583  (3) With the approval of the department, a manufacturer may supply the information 
584 required in paragraph (2) for a category or type of consumer product rather than for each 
585 individual product.  

29 of 36 586  (4) In a manner determined by the department, a manufacturer shall update and revise the 
587 information required under paragraph (2) whenever there is a significant change in the 
588 information or when requested to do so by the department.    
589  (5) The department may establish by regulation and assess a fee payable by a 
590 manufacturer upon submission of the notification required under paragraph (2) to cover the 
591 department’s reasonable costs in developing and administering this section and to support the 
592 purposes outlined in this section collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS 
593 Public Health Trust Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for 
594 the purposes outlined in this section.    
595  (6) Any information submitted to, or developed by, the department in furtherance of this 
596 section, except for the specific information required to be disclosed in subsection (f)(2) of this 
597 section shall not be a public record and shall be exempt from disclosure under clause twenty-
598 sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 and section 10 of chapter 66 of the General Laws.  
599  (g) (1) A manufacturer of consumer products registered under paragraph (2) of subsection 
600 (f) shall send an electronic notification to distributors and wholesalers of the consumer product 
601 that the consumer product contains PFAS.   
602  (2) A distributor or wholesaler who receives a notification pursuant to paragraph (1) shall 
603 send an electronic notification to retailers of the consumer product that the consumer product 
604 contains PFAS.   
605  (3) The attorney general shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this 
606 subsection under G.L. c. 93A, § 4.   

30 of 36 607  (h) (1) A manufacturer of any priority products that are sold, offered for sale, distributed 
608 or offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the state shall establish an audit 
609 program to test for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS using analytical methods 
610 approved by the department in consultation with the department of environmental protection and 
611 the Toxics Use Reduction Institute.   
612  (2) The department shall establish by regulation and assess a fee payable by a 
613 manufacturer under paragraph (1) to cover the department’s reasonable costs in testing a 
614 consumer product for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS at the request of a 
615 manufacturer. Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS Public 
616 Health Trust Fund established under subsection (j) to be administered by the department for the 
617 purposes outlined in this section.    
618  (i) (1) There shall be a PFAS Public Health Trust Fund. Expenditures from the fund shall 
619 be made by the department, without further appropriation and consistent with this section, and 
620 consistent with the terms of other allocations and monies transferred to this fund, as applicable. 
621 The commissioner shall administer the fund for purposes outlined in this section, and may make 
622 expenditures from the fund to develop and implement a multilingual outreach and education 
623 campaign pursuant to section 29 of chapter 21A of the General Laws.   
624  (2) The fund shall be expended to support the education of Massachusetts residents of 
625 PFAS contamination across the commonwealth and the potential health impacts of PFAS 
626 exposure, to mitigate the impacts of PFAS in consumer products in the commonwealth, and to 
627 support the development of PFAS-free alternatives by the Toxic Use Reduction Institute. The 
628 commissioner shall make necessary expenditures from this account for the shared administrative 

31 of 36 629 costs of the operations and programs of the department related to the fund, including but not 
630 limited to the unavoidable use exemption process under section (c) paragraph (5) and the testing 
631 a consumer product for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS. The commissioner shall 
632 further direct that monies from the fund shall be expended to provide services in an amount 
633 reasonably related to such administrative costs. No expenditure shall be made from the fund that 
634 would cause the fund to be in deficit at the close of a fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund 
635 shall not be subject to further appropriation and monies remaining in the fund at the end of the 
636 fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund, but shall instead be available for expenditure 
637 during subsequent fiscal years. Any fiscal year-end balance in the fund shall be excluded from 
638 the calculation of the consolidated net surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the 
639 General Laws.    
640  (3) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) fees payable by a manufacturer, distributor, 
641 wholesaler or retailer upon submission of an unavoidable use exemption request under section 
642 (c) paragraph (5); (ii) transfers from other funds authorized by the general court and so 
643 designated; (iii) funds from public or private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, 
644 donations, rebates, settlements, judgments, awards, and other allocations received by the 
645 commonwealth designated to the fund; and (iv) any interest earned on such amounts. 
646  SECTION 12. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
647 section 171 the following section:-   
648  Section 171A. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the 
649 following meanings:    
650  “Biosolids”, treated or untreated sewage sludge.  

32 of 36 651  “Department”, the department of environmental protection. 
652  “Fertilizer”, shall be as defined in section 64 of chapter 128.   
653  (b) The application of biosolids on land is prohibited. 
654  (c) Fertilizer derived from or containing biosolids, soil amendments derived from or 
655 containing biosolids and other product or material that is intended for use as a fertilizer, soil 
656 amendment, topsoil replacement or mulch or for other similar agricultural purpose that is derived 
657 from or contains biosolids shall not be sold or distributed in the commonwealth. 
658  (d) A manufacturer of any fertilizer or other soil amendment shall submit written notice 
659 to the department of environmental protection and the department of agricultural resources 
660 certifying that said fertilizer or other soil amendment is not derived from and does not contain 
661 biosolids. The manufacturer’s written notice shall be submitted electronically in a format to be 
662 specified by the department, in consultation with the department of agricultural resources. The 
663 department shall make information reported under this subsection available to the public via the 
664 department’s website.   
665  SECTION 13. Section 66 of chapter 128 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
666 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-  
667  The commissioner shall not issue a license to distribute any type of fertilizer, except 
668 specialty fertilizer, unless the licensee certifies that the fertilizer is not derived from and does not 
669 contain biosolids, as defined in section 171A of chapter 111. The commissioner shall not 
670 approve an application for registration of a specialty fertilizer, soil conditioner or agricultural 
671 liming material unless the applicant certifies that the specialty fertilizer, soil conditioner or 

33 of 36 672 agricultural liming material is not derived from and does not contain biosolids, as defined in 
673 section 117A of chapter 111. A manufacturer’s written notice delivered to the department in 
674 accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of section 171A of chapter 111 shall satisfy the 
675 requirements of this paragraph.  
676  SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, cities and 
677 towns which can demonstrate that they are incurring additional costs for sludge disposal under 
678 section 171A of chapter 111, as inserted by this act, shall annually submit to the division of local 
679 services within the department of revenue, itemized financial statements demonstrating costs for 
680 sludge disposal for the current fiscal year as well as for the 3 years preceding the effective date 
681 of this act. The division shall certify costs submitted by municipalities within 90 days of having 
682 received a submission. Any additional costs incurred by a city or town for sludge disposal under 
683 section 171A of chapter 11 of the general laws, as inserted by this act, as certified by the 
684 division, shall be reimbursed at a rate of 100 per cent not more than 30 days after the costs have 
685 been certified, provided that the reimbursement shall be discounted equal to the estimated rate of 
686 inflation. For the purposes of this section, sludge shall be defined by section 18 of chapter 16 of 
687 the general laws. The department of revenue shall promulgate regulations for the implementation 
688 and administration of this section not later than December 31, 2027.  
689  SECTION 15. The study and comprehensive statewide master plan required by section 
690 25 of chapter 16 of the general laws shall be completed not later than June 30, 2027 and shall be 
691 submitted to the joint committee on agriculture and fisheries, the joint committee on the 
692 environment and natural resources, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the 
693 clerks of the house of representatives and the senate. 

34 of 36 694  SECTION 16. Not later than December 31, 2030, the department of environmental 
695 protection shall submit a report to the Chairs of the Joint Committee on Public Health and the 
696 Joint Committee on Environment and Natural Resources regarding its progress in establishing 
697 standards to monitor PFAS in ambient air. This report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the 
698 department’s capacity to establish these standards; (ii) the steps the department has taken or 
699 plans to take to establish these standards; and; (iii) a projected timeline detailing when the 
700 department expects to finish establishing standards to monitor PFAS in ambient air.   
701  SECTION 17. The department of environmental protection shall promulgate regulations 
702 for the implementation of section 35TT of chapter 10, as inserted by section of this act, and 
703 sections 25 and 25A of chapter 16, as inserted by section 2 of this act,s not later than June 30, 
704 2028.  
705  SECTION 18. The department of agricultural resources shall promulgate rules and 
706 regulations for the implementation of section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29, as inserted by section 8 of 
707 this act, not later than December 31, 2027.  
708  SECTION 19. The department of agricultural resources, in consultation with the 
709 department of revenue and the department of environmental protection, shall promulgate 
710 regulations to implement the provisions in sections 12 and 13 of chapter 61A, as inserted by 
711 sections 9 and 10 of this act, not later than December 31, 2027. 
712  SECTION 20. The department of public health shall promulgate regulations to implement 
713 subsection (b) of section 5U no later than December 31, 2027.  The department of public health 
714 shall promulgate regulations to implement the remaining provisions in sections 5T and 5U of 
715 chapter 111, as inserted by section 11 of this act, not later than December 31, 2028. 

35 of 36 716  SECTION 21. The department of environmental protection, in consultation with the 
717 department of public health and the department of agricultural resources, shall promulgate 
718 regulations to implement section 171A of chapter 111, as inserted by section 12 of this act.  
719  SECTION 22. Section 43B of said chapter 21, as inserted by section 4 of this act, shall 
720 take effect one year after the effective date of this act.  
721  SECTION 23. Section 8 of Chapter 21A, as inserted by section 5 of this act, shall take 
722 effect on June 30, 2028 
723  SECTION 24. Section 7 of Chapter 22D, as inserted by section 7, shall take effect 
724 January 1, 2029.  
725  SECTION 25. Section 5T of said chapter 111, as inserted by section 11 of this act, shall 
726 take effect January 1, 2028. Subsection (c) of section 5T of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
727 upon enactment.   
728  SECTION 26. Subsection (b) of said section 5U of said chapter 111, as inserted by 
729 section 11 of this act, shall take effect January 1, 2029.   
730  SECTION 27. Subsection (c) of said section 5U of said chapter 111, as inserted by 
731 section 11 of this act, shall take effect January 1, 2030.   
732  SECTION 28. Additional product categories added under subsection (d) of said section 
733 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect two years after the product category has been added for 
734 restriction by the department.  
735  SECTION 29.  Subsection (g) of said section 5U of said chapter 111, as inserted by 
736 section 11 of this act, shall take effect June 1, 2028.   

36 of 36 737  SECTION 30. Subsection (h) of said section 5U of said chapter 111, as inserted by 
738 section 11 of this act, shall take effect June 1, 2028.   
739  SECTION 31. Subsection (i) of said section 5U of said chapter 111, as inserted by 
740 section 11 of this act, shall take effect January 1, 2028.   
741  SECTION 32. Section 171A of Chapter 111, as inserted by section 12 of this act, shall 
742 take effect on June 30, 2028. 
743  SECTION 33. Section 66 of Chapter 128, as inserted by section 13 of this act, shall take 
744 effect on June 30, 2028.